Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1438.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. IC3 James S. Dunlap Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) James Scott Dunlap was born January 22, 1967, at Philipsburg Hospital in Philipsburg, Centre County, and later attended Philipsburg-Osceola Area High School.(2) He also attended Great Lakes Naval Training Center in Illinois and Interior Communications 'A' School in San Diego, California.(3) He was a Petty Officer Third Class in the United States Navy and served as an Interior Communications Electrician (IC3) on board the USS Stark FFG-31 from November 12345678910111213141516171819 1984 to May 1987, stationed out of Mayport Base, Jacksonville, Florida.(4) On May 17, 1987, Petty Officer Third Class Dunlap was killed in action on board the USS Stark in the Persian Gulf when Iraqi aircraft fired missiles at the ship.(b) Designation.--The portion of State Route 2051 from the intersection with Elizabeth Street (segment 0020/offset 1600) to the Decatur Township Line (segment 0030/offset 0000) in Osceola Mills Borough, Clearfield County, is designated the IC3 James S. Dunlap Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the designated highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1438PN1677 - 2 - 123456789101112131415